Arkansas, session 2025, HB1733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Preschool is an essential resource and component in the
State of Arkansas that is necessary to prepare young children to adequately
participate in a learning environment in elementary education;
(2) Currently, the Arkansas Better Chance Program and Arkansas
Better Chance for School Success Program have twenty-three thousand (23,000)
available preschool slots between the two programs;
(3) It is in the best interest of Arkansas's families and
childcare providers to combine the Arkansas Better Chance Program and
Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program to promote efficiency in
the use and administration of the programs; and
(4) The qualifications for eligibility to participate in the
Arkansas Better Chance Program and Arkansas Better Chance for School Success
Program should be established by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education and should be the same qualifications for eligibility to
*TNL228*
03-31-2025 12:13:04 TNL228

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1733
participate in the Arkansas Better Chance Program for the 2024-2025 school
year.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure a greater
opportunity for a more efficient utilization of current slots and resources
available in both the Arkansas Better Chance Program and Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program for Arkansas families and childcare
providers.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-45-104(a)(2), concerning the requirement
of a local school to work with the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education to develop an Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program in
certain circumstances, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A local school is required to work with the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education and its local community to establish,
promote, and assist in the development of a program under the Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program to serve all children in the school as
provided in § 6-45-108 § 6-45-105, if the school is located in a school
district classified as in need of Level 5 — Intensive support.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-45-105 is amended to read as follows:
6-45-105. Establishment of Arkansas Better Chance Program — Arkansas
Better Chance for School Success Program.
(a)(1)(A) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish the Arkansas Better Chance Program to assist in the establishment
and funding of the appropriate early childhood programs for children from
birth through five (5) years of age.
(B) Within the Arkansas Better Chance Program there is
established the Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program for
providing appropriate early care and education programs for children three
(3) years of age and four (4) years of age as identified under § 6-45-108(a)
from birth through five (5) years of age.
(C) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
shall establish the same criteria and qualifications for eligibility to
participate in the Arkansas Better Chance Program and the Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program.
(D) A child from birth through five (5) years of age who
03-31-2025 12:13:04 TNL228

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1733
meets at least one (1) of the qualifications established by the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education for the Arkansas Better Chance Program or
the Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program shall be eligible to
participate in the Arkansas Better Chance Program or the Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program.
(2)(A) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
award grants or contracts to appropriate early childhood programs
selected by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education in accordance
with specified programmatic standards.
(B)(i) These standards will shall be developed by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, with the advice and
assistance of the Arkansas Early Childhood Commission.
(ii) Standards for funding the Home Instruction for
Parents of Preschool Youngsters (HIPPY) U.S.A. will shall be developed in
conjunction with the Arkansas HIPPY Advisory Board.
(C) The Home Instruction for Parents of Preschool
Youngsters (HIPPY) U.S.A. regional technical assistance and training center
shall be defined and funded as an integral part of the Home Instruction for
Parents of Preschool Youngsters (HIPPY) U.S.A. to provide necessary training,
technical assistance, and program support to program sites in Arkansas.
(b) The programmatic standards and other rules necessary for the
implementation of the Arkansas Better Chance Program and the Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program shall be adopted by the State Board of
Education in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative
Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(c)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may expend a
maximum of two percent (2%) of available funds to administer the Arkansas
Better Chance Program and the Arkansas Better Chance for School Success
Program and to monitor Arkansas Better Chance Program and Arkansas Better
Chance for School Success Program grantees to ensure compliance with
programmatic standards.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education may
contract with the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education to
administer the Arkansas Better Chance Program and the Arkansas Better Chance
for School Success Program.

03-31-2025 12:13:04 TNL228

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1733
SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-45-108 is repealed.
6-45-108. Criteria for determining need.
(a)(1) All children three (3) years of age and four (4) years of age
who are members of a family with a gross family income not exceeding two
hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty guidelines are eligible to
attend an Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program if there is an
Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program available in the school
district where the child resides and if there is available space for the
child to attend the Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and the
Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education may develop a fee
schedule and establish eligibility based on family income for children who
are not eligible under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, but priority
enrollment shall be allowed to children eligible under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section.
(b) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and the
Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education shall review various
criteria for identifying and targeting the areas of the state with the
greatest need for early childhood programs.
(c) The State Board of Education, with the advice and assistance of
the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education, shall adopt the
appropriate criteria for identifying Arkansas children with the greatest need
to participate in Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program-funded
early childhood programs.

/s/Joey Carr










03-31-2025 12:13:04 TNL228